Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.450

Deposit to defray department's expenses—Circumstances requiring reimbursement.

Prior to the issuance of any marketing agreement or order, the director may require the applicants therefor to deposit with him or her such amount of money as the director may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing and making effective such agreement or order.

(1) A commodity board shall reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department when a commodity board petitions the director to amend or terminate a marketing order or agreement and for other services provided by the department under this chapter. The department shall provide to a commodity board an estimate of expenses that may be incurred to amend or terminate a marketing order or agreement prior to any services taking place.

(2) Petitioners who are not a majority of a commodity board, and who file a petition with the director to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order or agreement, shall deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the department, under rules adopted by the director.

(3) A commodity board shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid to the department under the following circumstances:

(a) If the petition is to issue a marketing order or agreement, the commodity board shall reimburse the petitioners the amount expended by the department when funds become available after establishment of the commodity board; or

(b) If the petition is to amend or terminate a marketing order or agreement and the proposal is assented to by the affected parties or affected producers, the commodity board shall reimburse the petitioners within thirty days of the referendum.

(4) If for any reason a proceeding is discontinued, the commodity board or petitioners, whichever is applicable, shall only reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department up until the time the proceeding is discontinued.

[ 2002 c 313 s 35; 1961 c 256 s 45.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.